Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 10
SEALS

Section

29-10-101. Seals.

Whenever this title requires the use of a seal in the performance of any duties, it shall be sufficient that a rubber stamp with a facsimile affixed thereon of the seal required to be used is placed or stamped upon the document requiring the seal with indelible ink.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 489, § 6, effective May 26.